California, session 20252026, SB316.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the High School Voter Registration Act.SEC. 2. Section 49041 of the Education Code is amended to read:49041. (a) The administrator of a public or private high school, or their designee, may appoint one or more pupils who are enrolled at that high school to be voter outreach coordinators.(b) A voter outreach coordinator may coordinate voter registration activities on their high school campus that encourage persons who are eligible to register to vote pursuant to Section 2101 of the Elections Code, or other persons who may submit an affidavit of registration pursuant to Section 2102 of the Elections Code, to apply to register to vote by submitting an affidavit of registration on paper or electronically on the internet website of the Secretary of State.(c) A voter outreach coordinator may, with the approval of the administrator of the high school, or their designee, coordinate election-related activities on their high school campus, including voter registration drives, mock elections, debates, and other election-related pupil outreach activities.SEC. 3. Section 51225.85 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 51225.8, to read:51225.85. (a) Commencing with the 2026–27 school year, the governing board of a school district, a county board of education, a state special school, and the governing body of a charter school shall ensure that each of its pupils receives, at least once before the pupil completes grade 11, information on how to properly preregister to vote and register to vote. This requirement shall only apply to school districts, county offices of education, state special schools, and charter schools that serve pupils in grade 11. The manner in which information is provided pursuant to this section shall be at the discretion of the governing board of the school district, the county board of education, the state special school, or the governing body of the charter school and may include information dissemination through in-class instruction, an existing program, family information sessions, or group or individual sessions with school counselors. The information provided shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, material related to all the following:(1) Voting eligibility and guidance published by the Secretary of State.(2) Services provided and materials published by the county elections office.(3) The opportunity to register to vote, which is optional and may be completed at any time including by visiting the Secretary of State’s mobile-friendly online voter registration tool at https://registertovote.ca.gov/.(4) The Student Poll Worker program.(5) How to vote, how to vote by mail, and the importance of the voter’s signature. including, but not limited to, in-person voting opportunities, vote by mail procedures, including the importance of the voter’s signature, ballot tracking services, services provided to voters with disabilities, and key election dates and deadlines.(b) The governing board of a school district, a county board of education, a state special school, and the governing body of a charter school shall, upon request of a pupil or a pupil’s parent or guardian, ensure that information regarding where to acquire a paper copy of a voter registration card is provided to that pupil, such as a referral to the Secretary of State’s internet website.(c) The governing board of a school district, a county board of education, a state special school, and the governing body of a charter school shall ensure that any information shared with parents, guardians, and pupils under this section is handled according to applicable state and federal pupil privacy laws and regulations.(d) The governing board of a school district, a county board of education, a state special school, and the governing body of a charter school may contract with a third-party nonprofit organization, with demonstrated experience providing nonpartisan youth civic engagement, to implement the requirements of this section.(e) The governing board of a school district, a county board of education, a state special school, and the governing body of a charter school are encouraged to consider satisfying the requirements of this section during the high school voter education weeks established by Section 49040.SEC. 4.  If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.